District of Columbia statutes.
16-1156

Recovery of profits by person evicted.

A person evicted, as prescribed by this subchapter, may, when the presumption upon which he is evicted is erroneous, maintain a civil action against the person who has occupied the property, or his executor or administrator, to recover the full profits of the property during the occupation, while the person, upon whose life the prior estate depends, is or was living.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 16-1156.
1973 Ed., § 16-1156.